Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,221
Forcible entry and detainer; notice to leave premises; when and how served.

It shall be the duty of the party, desiring to commence an action under sections 25-21,219 to 25-21,235, to notify the adverse party to leave the premises for the possession of which the action is about to be brought. This notice shall be served at least three days before commencing the action by leaving a written copy with such adverse party, or at his usual place of abode, if he cannot be found. Where the defendant or his usual place of abode cannot be found in the county where the premises are located, such notice may be served by leaving such notice at or posting it on the detained premises.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 120, p. 310;

C.S.1929, § 22-1204;

Laws 1943, c. 48, § 2, p. 199;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,121;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 71;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-571.

The 3‑day notice or "notice to quit" is necessary to obtaining an order of restitution in a forcible entry and detainer action. I. P. Homeowners v. Morrow, 12 Neb. App. 119, 668 N.W.2d 515 (2003).